Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2320.02
Use of plastic or nonmetallic underground facilities; installation requirements.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the One-Call Notification System Act, any plastic or nonmetallic underground facilities installed underground on or after January 1, 2021, shall be installed in such a manner as to be locatable, either by mapping or by use of tracer wire, by the operator for purposes of the act.

Laws 2019, LB462, § 10.